California statutes. Education Code
(b) A student who qualifies for an exemption from paying nonresident tuition and other applicable fees under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to maintain “covered individual” status as long as the student remains continuously enrolled at a campus, even if the student enrolls in multiple programs, and the student shall continue to be exempt from paying nonresident
 tuition and other fees that exclusively apply to nonresident students. As used in this section, “continuously enrolled” means enrolled for at least the fall and spring semesters of an academic year, or for at least three of the quarters in an academic year for an institution using the quarter system.

(c) The attendance of a community college student who is exempt from paying nonresident tuition and other fees pursuant to this section may be reported by the community college district of attendance for apportionment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 3.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68076.

Notwithstanding Section 68062, a student who (a) has not been an adult resident of California for more than one year and (b) is either the dependent child of a California resident who has had residence in California for more than one year prior to the residence determination date, or has a parent who has both contributed court-ordered support for the student on a continuous basis and has been a California resident for a minimum of one year, shall be entitled to resident classification. This exception shall continue until the student has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident, so long as continuous attendance is maintained at an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 15.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

68077.

Notwithstanding Section 68062, a student who is a graduate of any school located in California that is operated by the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs, including, but not limited to, the Sherman Indian High School, shall be entitled to resident classification. This exception shall continue so long as continuous attendance is maintained by the student at an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 16.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

68078.

(a) A student holding a valid credential authorizing service in the public schools of this state who is employed by a school district in a full-time position requiring certification qualifications for the college year in which the student enrolls in an institution is entitled to resident classification if that student meets any of the following requirements:

(1) He or she holds a provisional credential and is enrolled at an institution in courses necessary to obtain another type of credential authorizing service in the public schools.

(2) He or she holds a credential issued pursuant to Section 44250 and is enrolled at an institution in courses necessary to fulfill credential requirements.

(3) He or she is enrolled at an institution in courses necessary to fulfill the requirements for a fifth year of education prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a student holding a valid emergency permit authorizing service in the public schools of this state, who is employed by a school district in a full-time position requiring certification qualifications for the academic year in which the student enrolls at an institution in courses necessary to fulfill teacher credential requirements, is entitled to resident classification only for the purpose of determining the amount of tuition and fees for no more than one year. Thereafter, the student shall be subject to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060).

(c) This section shall not be construed to affect the admissions policies of any teacher preparation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 949, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

68079.

A student who is a full-time employee of an institution or of any state agency, or a student who is a child or spouse of a full-time employee of an institution or of any state agency, may be entitled to resident classification, as determined by the governing boards, until he or she has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

For purposes of this section, “employee of any state agency” means a person employed by the state on or after the effective date of this section, who is assigned to work outside of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1172, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

68080.

A student who is a minor and resides with either his father or mother in a district or territory not in a district shall be entitled to resident classification, provided that the father or mother has been domiciled in California for more than one year prior to the residence determination date for the semester, quarter or term for which he proposes to attend a community college and provided that he meets the other requirements of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68081.

A student who is enrolled in a state government legislative, executive, or judicial fellowship program administered by the state or the California State University is entitled to resident classification at the California State University during the period of the fellowship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 66.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

68082.

A student who is a native American is entitled to resident classification for attendance at a community college if the student is also attending a school administered by the Bureau of Indian Affairs located within the community college district.

As used in this section, “native American” means an American Indian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

68083.

(a) Any Team USA student athlete who trains in the state in an elite level program approved by the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee is entitled to resident classification for tuition and fee purposes until the athlete has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(b) The student athlete shall certify their participation in an Olympic or Paralympic elite level training program through supporting documentation from the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee verifying eligibility, and shall submit the supporting documentation to the campus they are attending at the California State University, University of California, or California Community Colleges.

(c) For purposes of this section, “Team USA student athlete” means any
 student athlete who meets the eligibility standards defined and approved by the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee and by the national governing body for the sport in which the athlete competes.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 972.)
-------------------------------------------

68083.

(a) Any amateur student athlete in training at the United States Olympic Training Center in the City of Chula Vista is entitled to resident classification for tuition purposes until the student athlete has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amateur student athlete” means any student athlete who meets the eligibility standards established by the national governing body for the sport in which the athlete competes.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2032.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 972, Sec. 2.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

68084.

(a) A parent who is a federal civil service employee and his or her natural or adopted dependent children are entitled to resident classification at the California State University, the University of California, or a California community college if the parent has moved to this state as a result of a military mission realignment action that involves the relocation of at least 100 employees. This classification shall continue until the student is entitled to be classified as a resident pursuant to Section 68017, so long as the student continuously attends an institution of public higher education.

(b) It shall be the responsibility of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California to certify qualifying military mission realignment actions under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

68085.

A student who currently resides in California and is 19 years of age or under at the time of enrollment, who is currently a dependent or ward of the state through California’s child welfare system, or was served by California’s child welfare system and is no longer being served either due to emancipation or aging out of the system, may be entitled to resident classification until he or she has resided in the
 state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 669)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

68086.

(a) A student seeking to enroll exclusively in career development and college preparation courses, and other courses for which no credit is given, at a community college shall not be subject to the residency classification requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 68040).

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prohibit the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges from collecting residency data, for a student
 described in subdivision (a), that is voluntarily submitted by the student after he or she enrolls at a community college.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 553, Sec. 2.   (AB 3101)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Community College District Residence [68100. - 68101.]

68100.

(a) A district may classify a student as a district resident if he or she lives with a parent who earns a livelihood primarily by performing agricultural labor for hire in California and other states and the parent has performed this labor in this state for at least two months per year in each of the two preceding years, the parent lives within the district which maintains the community college attended by the student, and the parent claims the student as a dependent on his or her state or federal personal income tax returns if he or she has sufficient income to have a personal income tax liability.

(b) A district may also classify a student as a district resident if he or she earns a livelihood primarily by performing agricultural labor for hire in California and other states and he or she has performed this labor in this state for at least two months per year in each of the two preceding years.

(c) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall prescribe rules and regulations for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 240.3.)
-------------------------------------------

68101.

A community college district may accept the determination of another community college district as to a student’s residency classification pursuant to a process established by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The student is cross-enrolling pursuant to Chapter 9.7 (commencing with Section 66770) of Part 40.

(b) The student is cross-enrolling in a course available through the online course exchange of the California Virtual Campus, as defined in Section 66770.

(c) The home college certifies the determination of the community college district as to the student’s residency
 classification.

(d) The student is enrolling in a course available at the teaching college through the online course exchange of the California Virtual Campus.

(e) The home college and the teaching college have both signed on to participate in the online course exchange of the California Virtual Campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Provisions Related to Particular Institutions [68120. - 68124.]

68120.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no mandatory systemwide fees or tuition or mandatory campus-based fees of any kind shall be required or collected by the Regents of the University of California, the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges from any surviving spouse or surviving child of a deceased person who met all of the following requirements:

(1) The deceased person was a resident of this state.

(2) The deceased person was employed by a public agency or was
 a contractor, or an employee of a contractor, performing services for a public agency, or was a firefighter employed by the federal government whose duty assignment involved the performance of firefighting services in this state.

(3) The deceased person’s principal duties consisted of active law enforcement service or active fire suppression and prevention. This section does not apply to a person whose principal duties were clerical, even if the person was subject to occasional call or was occasionally called upon to perform duties within the scope of active law enforcement or active fire suppression and prevention.

(4) The deceased person was killed in the performance of active law enforcement or active fire suppression and prevention duties, died as a result of an accident or an injury caused by external violence or physical force incurred in the performance of the person’s
 active law enforcement or active fire suppression and prevention duties, or died as a result of an industrial injury or illness arising out of and in the course of active law enforcement or fire suppression and prevention duties.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who qualifies for the waiver of mandatory systemwide fees and tuition and mandatory campus-based fees under this section as a surviving child of a contractor, or of an employee of a contractor, who performed services for a public agency shall, in addition to the requirements set forth in subdivision (a), meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Enrollment as an undergraduate student at a campus of the University of California or the California State University or as a student at a community college campus.

(2) Documentation that the student’s
 annual income, including the value of any support received from a parent, does not exceed the maximum household income and asset level for an applicant for a Cal Grant B award, as set forth in Section 69432.7.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Contractor” or “employee of a contractor” does not include a security guard or security officer, as defined in Section 7582.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Public agency” means the state or any city, county, city and county, district, or other local authority or public body of or within the state.

(3) “Spouse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22171.

(4) “Surviving child” means either of the following:

(A) A surviving natural or adopted child of the deceased person.

(B) A surviving stepchild who meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The stepchild was living or domiciled with the deceased person at the time of the deceased person’s death.

(ii) The stepchild was claimed on the tax form most recently filed by the deceased person before that person’s death, or the stepchild received 50 percent or more of the stepchild’s support from that deceased person in the tax year immediately preceding the death of the deceased person, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 15.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68120.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no mandatory systemwide fees or tuition or mandatory campus-based fees of any kind shall be required or collected by the Regents of the University of California, the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, from any surviving spouse or surviving child of a deceased person who met all of the following requirements:

(1) The deceased person was a resident of this state.

(2) The deceased person was a licensed physician or a
 licensed nurse employed by or under contract with a health facility regulated and licensed by the State Department of Public Health to provide medical services or a first responder employed to provide emergency services as described in Section 8562 of the Government Code.

(3) The deceased person’s principal duties consisted of providing medical services or emergency services during the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency.

(4) The deceased person died of COVID-19 during the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who qualifies for the waiver of mandatory systemwide fees and tuition and mandatory campus-based fees under this section as a surviving child or spouse of a licensed physician, licensed nurse, or first responder, as defined in this section, in addition to the
 requirements set forth in subdivision (a), shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Enrollment as an undergraduate student at a campus of the University of California or the California State University or as a student at a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(2) Documentation that the student’s annual income, including the value of any support received from a parent, does not exceed the maximum household income and asset level for an applicant for a Cal Grant A award, as set forth in Section 69432.7.

(3) The surviving child or spouse was a resident of California during the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency.

(c) Any determination of eligibility shall be confirmed through documentation of a certified death certificate and
 documentation of the deceased’s employment during the COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency provided by the surviving child or spouse.

(d) A determination of residency shall be based on the criteria set forth in this chapter for determining nonresident and resident tuition. Exemptions to residency determination shall apply to this section.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 pandemic state of emergency” means the period of time from the first declaration of emergency on March 4, 2020, until the Governor lifts the state of emergency.

(2) “First responder” has the same definition as in Section 8562 of the Government Code.

(3) “Licensed nurse” means a holder of a nursing license for
 medical care authorized by the Board of Registered Nursing or by the Board of Vocational Nurses and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.

(4) “Licensed physician” means a holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate who is engaged in the professional practice of providing medical care authorized by the Medical Board of California.

(5) “Surviving child” means either of the following:

(A) A surviving natural or adopted child of the deceased person.

(B) A surviving stepchild who meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The stepchild was living or domiciled with the deceased person at the time of the deceased person’s death.

(ii) The stepchild was claimed on the tax form most recently filed by the deceased person prior to that person’s death, or the stepchild received 50 percent or more of the stepchild’s support from that deceased person in the tax year immediately preceding the death of the deceased person, or both.

(6) “Surviving spouse” has the same meaning as “spouse” in Section 22171.

(f) (1) A surviving spouse is entitled to the fee waiver authorized by this section until January 1, 2033.

(2) A surviving child is entitled to the fee waiver authorized by this section until that person attains 30 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 16.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68120.5.

Any determination of eligibility pursuant to Section 68120 shall be consistent with any findings of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, using the same procedures as in workers’ compensation hearings, as to whether the death of the person described under subdivision (a) of that section was industrial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

68120.7.

The college named in Section 92200 and each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University that has an internet website shall, and each campus of the University of California that has an internet website shall, in the event that an appropriate resolution is enacted pursuant to Section 68134, provide an online posting or notice of systemwide fee or tuition waivers available to students pursuant to Section 68120, Section 68120.3, or both, as applicable. The online posting or notice shall be done in accordance with all of the following:

(a) It shall be accessible through a prominent direct link to an application for a waiver of the systemwide fee or tuition.

(b) The direct link shall appear
 on the primary internet web page of the financial aid section of the campus website.

(c) The direct link shall be accompanied by a description of the systemwide fee or tuition waiver to clearly indicate the type of student who would potentially be eligible to apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 17.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68121.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no mandatory systemwide fees or tuition of any kind shall be required or collected by the Regents of the University of California or the Trustees of the California State University, from a student who is in an undergraduate program and who is the surviving dependent of any individual killed in the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks on the World Trade Center in New York City, the Pentagon building in Washington, DC, or the crash of United Airlines Flight 93 in southwestern Pennsylvania, if the student meets the financial need requirements set forth in Section 69432.7 for the Cal Grant A Program and either of the following apply:

(1) The surviving dependent was a resident of California on September 11, 2001.

(2) The individual killed in the attacks was a resident of California on September 11, 2001.

(b) (1) The California Victim Compensation Board shall identify all persons who are eligible for tuition and fee waivers pursuant to this section or subdivision (j) of Section 76300. That board shall notify these persons or, in the case of minors, the parents or guardians of these persons, of their eligibility for tuition and fee waivers under these provisions. This notification shall be in writing, and shall be received by all of the appropriate persons no later than July 1, 2003.

(2) The Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of each community college district in the state shall waive tuition and fees, as specified in this section
 and in subdivision (j) of Section 76300, for any person who can demonstrate eligibility. If requested by the California State University, the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, or a California Community College, the California Victim Compensation Board, on a case-by-case basis, shall confirm the eligibility of persons requesting the waiver of tuition and fees, as provided for in this section.

(c) A determination of whether a person is a resident of California on September 11, 2001, shall be based on the criteria set forth in this chapter for determining nonresident and resident tuition.

(d) (1) “Dependent,” for purposes of this section, is a person who, because of their relationship to an individual killed as a result of injuries sustained during the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, qualifies for compensation under the
 federal September 11th Victim Compensation Fund of 2001 (Title IV (commencing with Section 401) of Public Law 107-42).

(2) A dependent who is the surviving spouse of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, is entitled to the waivers provided in this section until January 1, 2013.

(3) A dependent who is the surviving child, natural or adopted, of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, is entitled to the waivers under this section until that person obtains the age of 30 years.

(4) A dependent of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, who is determined to be eligible by the California Victim Compensation Board, is also entitled to the waivers provided in this section until January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 18.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68122.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, students who are victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes who have been granted a status under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii), or Section 1101(a)(15)(U)(i) or (ii), of Title 8 of the United States Code shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition at the California State University and the California Community Colleges to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) The University of California is requested to adopt policies that are consistent with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

68123.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Trustees of the California State University may enter into agreements with other universities or colleges located within the state whereby qualified students from campuses of the California State University may attend the other universities or colleges without payment of some or all fees or tuition, or both, charged by the other institutions, and students from the other institutions may attend campuses of the California State University without payment of some or all of the fees or tuition, or both, charged by the state university. During any year, however, the number of students attending campuses of the California State University from other universities or colleges, pursuant to the agreements entered in between the Trustees of the California State University and other universities and colleges, shall not exceed the number of students of the California State University attending the other institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

68124.

The trustees may enter into agreements with public colleges and universities in other states whereby qualified students from the California State University may attend the other college or university without payment of any tuition fee charged by that institution to persons who are nonresidents of the state in which it is situate, and students from that institution may attend the California State University without payment of the nonresident tuition established pursuant to Section 89705. No nonresident tuition shall be charged of students attending a campus of the California State University pursuant to an agreement entered into under this section. During any year, however, the number of students attending the California State University from a particular public college or university in another state, pursuant to the agreement, shall not exceed the number of the California State University students attending the institution under that agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 70.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Miscellaneous Provisions [68130. - 68134.]

68130.

The governing boards and district governing boards may waive nonresident tuition in whole or in part pursuant to Sections 68123, 76140, 89705, and 89707.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

68130.5.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) A student, other than a person excluded from the term “immigrant,” for purposes of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101), pursuant to paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Section 1101 of Title 8 of the United States Code, shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition at the California State University and the California Community Colleges if the student meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Satisfaction of the requirements of either subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B):

(A) A total attendance of, or attainment of
 credits earned while in California equivalent to, three or more years of full-time attendance or attainment of credits at any of the following:

(i) California high schools.

(ii) California high schools established by the State Board of Education.

(iii) California adult schools established by any of the following entities:

(I) A county office of education.

(II) A unified school district or high school district.

(III) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(iv) Campuses of the California Community Colleges.

(v) A combination of those schools set forth in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(B) Three or more years of full-time high school coursework in California, and a total of three or more years of attendance in California elementary schools, California secondary schools, or a combination of California elementary and secondary schools.

(C) (i) Full-time attendance at a campus of the California Community Colleges counted towards the requirements of this paragraph shall comprise either a minimum of 12 units of credit per semester or quarter equivalent per year or a minimum of 420 class hours per year or semester or quarter equivalent per year in noncredit
 courses authorized pursuant to Section 84757.

(ii) Full-time attendance at a California adult school counted towards the requirements of this paragraph shall be a minimum of 420 class hours of attendance for each school year in classes or courses authorized pursuant to Section 41976 or Sections 2053 to 2054.2, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(2) Satisfaction of any of the following:

(A) Graduation from a California high school or attainment of the equivalent thereof.

(B) Attainment of an associate degree from a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(C) Fulfillment of the minimum transfer
 requirements
 established for the University of California or the California State University for students transferring from a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(3) Registration as an entering student at, or current enrollment at, an accredited institution of higher education in California not earlier than the fall semester or quarter of the 2001–02 academic year.

(4) (A) In the case of a person without lawful immigration status, the filing of an affidavit with the institution of higher education stating that the student has filed an application to legalize the student’s immigration status, or will file an application as soon as the student is eligible to do so.

(B) (i) The California State University and California Community Colleges shall, and the University of California and independent institutions of higher education are requested to, accept an affidavit provided to the Student Aid Commission as part of the student’s financial aid application for purposes of meeting the requirement in subparagraph (A).

(ii) An institution that receives an affidavit from the Student Aid Commission pursuant to clause (i) shall share the affidavit with any departments within the institution that require such an affidavit to ensure that students are not required to submit multiple affidavits.

(iii) The institution of higher education shall not require a student to file a separate affidavit. This shall not preclude the institution of higher education from verifying the information provided on the affidavit, as the institution deems necessary.

(iv) Notwithstanding clause (i), the institution of higher education may provide an
 affidavit for students who do not apply for state financial aid to submit for the purposes of complying with subparagraph (A).

(b) A student who is exempt from nonresident tuition under this section may be reported by a community college district as a full-time equivalent student for apportionment purposes.

(c) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall prescribe rules and regulations for the implementation of this section.

(d) Student information obtained in the implementation of this section is confidential.

(e) For purposes of this section, “independent institutions of higher
 education” has the same meaning as in Section 66010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

68130.7.

If a state court finds that Section 66021.6, 66021.7, 66021.9, or 68130.5, or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the court may order, as equitable relief, that the administering entity that is the subject of the lawsuit terminate any waiver awarded under that statute or provision, but no money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive relief, may be awarded. In any action in which the court finds that Section 66021.6, 66021.7, 66021.9, or 68130.5, or any similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is unlawful, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California are immune from the imposition of any award of money damages, tuition refund or waiver, or other retroactive
 relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 6.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

68131.

The governing boards and district governing boards may enter into agreements with appropriate agencies and institutions of higher education in other states and foreign countries providing for the exchange of students in higher educational institutions in this state and other states or countries pursuant to Sections 68124, 76140, and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 66800) of Part 40 of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68133.

If an action is brought against a governing board as the result of the application of this chapter, that governing board shall inform the governing boards of the other institutions regarding the litigation. If an action is brought against a district governing board as a result of the application of this chapter, that district governing board shall inform the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, who shall inform the Regents of the University of California, and the Trustees of the California State University, regarding the pending litigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

68134.

No provision of this part shall be applicable to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make such provision applicable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 41.5. WAIVER OF FEES FOR EXONERATED PERSONS [69000. - 69000.]

69000.

(a) (1) No mandatory systemwide fees or tuition of any kind shall be required or collected by the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or any community college district from a student who has been exonerated, as that term is defined in Section 3007.05 of the Penal Code, if the student meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Completes and submits the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA).

(B) Meets the financial need requirements established for Cal Grant A awards under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42.

(2) A student shall not have the student’s mandatory systemwide tuition or fees waived pursuant to this subdivision in excess of the equivalent of six years of full-time attendance in an undergraduate program.

(b) A person who is eligible for a waiver of tuition or fees under this section may receive a waiver for each academic year during which the person applies for that waiver, but an eligible person may not receive a waiver of tuition or fees for a prior academic year.

(c) The waiver of tuition or fees under this section shall apply only to a person who is determined to be a resident of this state pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 42. STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PROGRAM [69400. - 70115.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. Selective Service Registration [69400. - 69400.]

69400.

Any accompanying regulations or formal policy to verify Selective Service registration is waived for applicants eligible for Cal Grants pursuant to Section 69508.5. The Student Aid Commission shall not consider verification of Selective Service registration in audits of the 2021–22 academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 262, Sec. 5.   (SB 169)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. The Cal Grant Reform Act [69405. - 69428.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [69405. - 69418.]

69405.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Cal Grant Reform Act. This chapter continues, without interruption or diminution, the operation of the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program established under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) as it read on December 31, 2022, until July 1, 2024, if funding is included in the annual Budget Act for this purpose. This chapter shall only become operative upon the appropriation by the Legislature, in the annual Budget Act or another statute, of sufficient funds to fully implement its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 8.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative by Sec. 65 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 54.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

69406.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
